Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 8 Watershed Improvement Districts
§ 41-8-121.
Assessments generally.

The board of directors shall, on or before the third Monday in July of each year, certify to the board of county commissioners of the county within the watershed improvement district in which assessed land is located the amount of the annual installments of assessments against the land, together with a fair proportionate amount of the estimated operating and maintenance charges apportioned to the land for the next succeeding year. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver the assessment roll to the county assessor of the county and the county assessor shall extend the amounts so certified on the tax roll as a flat special assessment against the land benefited. The assessments shall be subject to the same interest and penalties in case of delinquency as in the case of general taxes, and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as in the case of general taxes; provided, that the assessments shall become due and payable only at the times and in the amounts as may be determined by the board of directors.

The board of directors in making the annual assessments and levies as herein provided, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the ensuing year as provided in its contracts, the maturing of bonds and interests on all bonds, and deficiencies and defaults of prior years, and shall make ample provisions for the payment thereof; provided however, that no one (1) yearly call for assessment by the board of directors shall be in an amount to exceed ten percent (10%) of the actual amount necessary to defray the cost of the construction of the improvement or project.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.21; Laws 1973, ch. 219, § 1.

Stated

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 410 U.S. 743, 93 S. Ct. 1237, 35 L. Ed. 2d 675, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 16 (1973).

§ 41-8-122.
Levy, collection and disposition of taxes and special assessments; expenditure of funds.

It shall be the duty of the officer or body having authority to levy taxes within each county, to levy the taxes and special assessments as provided in this act [§§

41-8-101

through

41-8-126

] and it shall be the duty of all county officials, charged with the duty of collecting taxes, to collect the taxes and special assessments as provided in this act in the time, form and manner and with like interest and penalties as city or county taxes are collected, and when collected to pay the same to the board of directors of the watershed improvement district ordering their levy and collection and the payments of such collections shall be made through the treasurer of the watershed improvement district and deposited in the depository thereof to the credit of such district. All expenditures of such funds shall be made by the board of directors upon order of the board, under the supervision of the board of supervisors.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.22.

Stated

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 410 U.S. 743, 93 S. Ct. 1237, 35 L. Ed. 2d 675, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 16 (1973).

§ 41-8-123.
Lien of assessment; collection of delinquent assessments.

All taxes and assessments levied against any land under this act [§§

41-8-101

through

41-8-126

] together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same, shall, until paid, constitute a perpetual lien upon such land on a parity with the tax lien of general, state, county, city, town or school taxes and no sale of such land to enforce any general, state, county, city, town or school tax or other liens shall extinguish the perpetual lien of such taxes and assessments. If the taxes and assessments levied are not paid as herein provided, then such land shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes and assessments, interest and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of this state for selling real property for nonpayment of general taxes.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.23.

Stated

in

Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 410 U.S. 743, 93 S. Ct. 1237, 35 L. Ed. 2d 675, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 16 (1973).

§ 41-8-124.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 24, provided for the discontinuance of districts.

§ 41-8-125.
Supervision upon discontinuance.

If any soil and water conservation district in which a watershed improvement district is situated is discontinued, the state soil and water conservation committee [conservation commission] shall thereafter serve in the same supervising capacity over the watershed improvement district as was theretofore served by the board of supervisors of such soil and water conservation district.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.25.

Soil and water conservation committee. —

The reference to the soil and water conservation committee apparently means the state conservation commission whose powers were transferred to the board of agriculture. See §§

11-16-102

through

11-16-106

and the notes thereto.

§ 41-8-126.
Existing water rights preserved.

Nothing in this act [§§

41-8-101

through

41-8-126

] shall be so construed as to in any manner impair existing water rights, appropriations or priorities.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 215, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.26.

The purpose of this section is satisfied if just compensation is awarded:

The prohibition against impairment of existing water rights, appropriations, or priorities contained in this section is not absolute as no condemnation by a watershed district could ever be accomplished without affecting existing water rights. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983).

Effect of extension of time. —

The mere extension of time within which to commence and complete a reservoir does not in any manner impair existing water rights, appropriations or priorities. Associated Enters. v. Toltec Watershed Improvement Dist., 578 P.2d 1359,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act. Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).